Indiana, session 2026, SB118.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 26-3-8-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.144-2014,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "last known address"
means the postal address or electronic mail address provided to the
owner by the renter:
(1) for the purposes of the latest rental agreement; or
(2) subject to the requirements in the rental agreement, in a
written notice of a change of postal address or electronic mail
address after the latest rental agreement.
SECTION 2. IC 26-3-8-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2023,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) After a renter has been in default
continuously for at least five (5) days, an owner may begin enforcement
of the owner's lien under this chapter.
(b) An owner enforcing the owner's lien under this chapter may:
(1) deny the renter access to the self-service storage facility,
including access to the rented space; and
SB 118—LS 6476/DI 154


(2) move the renter's personal property from the rented space to
another storage space pending the redemption, sale, or other
disposition of the personal property under this chapter.
(c) An owner enforcing the owner's lien shall send the renter, by
electronic mail or verified mail and addressed to the last known address
of the renter, a written notice that includes:
(1) an itemized statement of the owner's claim showing the
amount due at the time of the notice and the date when the
amount became due;
(2) a demand for payment of the amount due before a specified
time at least thirty (30) days after the date of the mailing of the
notice;
(3) a statement that the contents of the renter's rented space are
subject to the owner's lien;
(4) a statement advising the renter that the owner has denied the
renter access to the rented space, if the owner has done this under
subsection (b);
(5) a statement advising the renter that the owner has removed the
renter's personal property from the rented space to another
suitable storage space, if the owner has done this under subsection
(b);
(6) the name, street address, and telephone number of the owner
or of any other person the renter may contact to respond to the
notice; and
(7) a conspicuous statement that unless the owner's claim is paid
within the time stated under subdivision (2), the personal
property:
(A) will:
(i) be advertised to be sold in a manner permitted under
section 15 of this chapter; or
(ii) be otherwise disposed of;
at a specified place (if applicable) and time, which must be at
least sixty (60) days after the renter's default; or
(B) will be disposed of in the manner described in subsection
(d), if:
(i) the renter's personal property stored in the rented space
is a motor vehicle, trailer, or watercraft; and
(ii) the owner chooses to dispose of the renter's motor
vehicle, trailer, or watercraft in the manner permitted under
subsection (d).
(d) If:
(1) the renter's personal property stored in the rented space is a
SB 118—LS 6476/DI 154


motor vehicle, trailer, or watercraft; and
(2) the renter does not pay the owner's claim within the time
specified in subsection (c)(2) or is in default for at least sixty
(60) days;
as an alternative to conducting a sale under section 15 of this chapter,
the owner may cause the renter's motor vehicle, trailer, or watercraft to
be towed or removed from the self-service storage facility.
(e) Any sale or other disposition of the personal property undertaken
by the owner to enforce the owner's lien must be conducted in the same
manner, and at the same place (if applicable) and time, specified by the
owner in the notice given under subsection (c)(7).
SECTION 3. IC 26-3-8-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.144-2014,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) This chapter does not impair the power of
the parties to a rental agreement to create rights, duties, or obligations
that do not arise from this chapter. The rights provided to an owner by
this chapter are in addition to all other rights provided by law to a
creditor against a debtor.
(b) A rental agreement may specify a limit on the value of personal
property that may be stored in a renter's rented space. If a rental
agreement specifies a limit on the value of stored personal property
under this subsection, the limit specified in the rental agreement is
considered the maximum value of the renter's personal property stored
in the renter's rented space.
(c) If a person does not sign a rental agreement delivered by the
owner to the person:
(1) in person;
(2) by electronic mail; or
(3) by first class mail that is addressed to the last known
address of the person;
the person's continued use of a storage space at the self-service
storage facility for thirty (30) or more days from the date that the
owner delivered the rental agreement to the person shall constitute
an acceptance of the rental agreement as though it had been signed
by the person.
(d) Subject to subsection (i), an owner may terminate or choose
not to renew a rental agreement between the owner and a renter if
the owner:
(1) delivers a written notice to the renter:
(A) in person;
(B) by electronic mail; or
(C) by verified mail that is addressed to the last known
SB 118—LS 6476/DI 154


address of the renter;
informing the renter of the termination or nonrenewal of the
rental agreement; and
(2) provides a renter not less than fifteen (15) days after the
owner delivers to the renter the written notice described in
subdivision (1) to remove all of the renter's personal property
from the rented space.
(e) A renter may not continue to use a storage space at the
self-service storage facility after the owner has delivered the
written notice described in subsection (d)(1).
(f) Prior to a former renter's removal of all of the former
renter's personal property from a self-service storage facility, but
after the owner has delivered the written notice described in
subsection (d)(1), the owner may place reasonable restrictions on
the former renter's access to the self-service storage facility and
any storage space located at the self-service storage facility,
including denying the former renter access to the self-service
storage facility and any storage space located at the self-service
storage facility for any purpose other than the former renter's
removal of all of the former renter's personal property from the
self-service storage facility.
(g) An owner may dispose of any personal property belonging
to a former renter that remains:
(1) in a storage space at the self-service storage facility; or
(2) on the premises of the self-service storage facility;
for more than thirty (30) days after the termination or nonrenewal
of a rental agreement between the owner and a former renter.
(h) A rental agreement may contain a provision notifying the
renter of the owner's right to dispose of personal property that
remains:
(1) in a storage space at the self-service storage facility; or
(2) on the premises of the self-service storage facility;
for more than thirty (30) days after the termination or nonrenewal
of a rental agreement.
(i) An owner may not deliver a notice under subsection (d) or
take action under subsection (f) or (g) if the renter is subject to lien
enforcement under section 12 of this chapter.
(j) A rental agreement may be delivered and executed
electronically.
SB 118—LS 6476/DI 154


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Judiciary, to which was
referred Senate Bill No. 118, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 3, line 36, delete "An" and insert "Subject to subsection (i),
an".
Page 4, line 25, delete "fifteen (15)" and insert "thirty (30)".
Page 4, line 32, delete "fifteen (15)" and insert "thirty (30)".
Page 4, between lines 33 and 34, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(i) An owner may not deliver a notice under subsection (d) or
take action under subsection (f) or (g) if the renter is subject to lien
enforcement under section 12 of this chapter.".
Page 4, line 34, delete "(i)" and insert "(j)".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 118 as introduced.)
CARRASCO, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 8, Nays 1.
SB 118—LS 6476/DI 154